fi-gr-parallel-harmony.foma
# Finnish inflectional grammar for calculating the minimal set of principal parts based on KOTUS inflectional classes
# https://kaino.kotus.fi/sanat/nykysuomi/taivutustyypit.php
# This version features vowel harmony and consonant gradation and takes those into account when determining classes
# Example usage: give 1 or more inflected forms in 

#NOMSG,GENSG,PARTSG1(-V),PARTSG2(-tA),ILLSG
#NOMPL,GENPL1(-ien),GENPL2(-iden),GENPL3(-itten),PARTPL1(-IA),PARTPL2(-ItA),ILLPL1(-VVn/-siin),ILLPL2(-hVn),ILLPL3(-ihVn, no consonant gradation)

# the 1,2,3 forms are to indicate which parallel forms exist for the lexeme. 
# For example:

# foma[1]: up hapuNOMSGhavunGENSGhapuILLPL3
# 1|hapu|havu|hapu
# 1|hapu|havku|hapu
# 1|hapu|haku|hapu
# 1|hapu|hapu|hapu
# 2|hapu|havu|hapu
# 21|hapu|havu|hapu

# Would query which paradigms the forms hapu(NOMSG), havun(GENSG) + missing(ILLPL3) [indicated by just repeating the nom sg form]

# The result (ignore lines where citation forms are different) shows that this lexeme could only fit KOTUS class 1: (1|hapu|hapu|hapu)

# The subslots are as follows:
# PARTSG1: -V, PARTSG2: -tA
# GENPL1: -ien, GENPL2: -iden, GENPL3: -itten
# PARTPL1: -Ia, PARTPL2: -itA
# ILLPL1: -VVn/-siin, ILLPL2: -(i)hVn [default/with consonant gradation], ILLPL3: -(i)hVn (but no CG)

def IDS   1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|10|11|12|13|14|15|16|17|18|19|20|21|22|23|24|25|26|27|28|29|30|31|32|33|34|35|36|37|38|39|40|41|42|43|44|45|46|47|48;
def LEX {valo}|{palvelu}|{valtio}|{laatikko}|{risti}|{paperi}|{ovi}|{nalle}|{kala}|{koira}|{omena}|{kulkija}|{katiska}|{solakka}|{korkea}|{vanhempi}|{vapaa}|{maa}|{suo}|{filee}|{rosé}|{parfait}|{tiili}|{uni}|{toimi}|{pieni}|{käsi}|{kynsi}|{lapsi}|{veitsi}|{kaksi}|{sisar}|{kytkin}|{onneton}|{lämmin}|{sisin}|{vasen}|{nainen}|{vastaus}|{kalleus}|{vieras}|{mies}|{ohut}|{kevät}|{kahdeksas}|{tuhat}|{kuollut}|{hame};

def TAGS  GENSG|PARTSG1|PARTSG2|NOMSG|ILLSG|NOMPL|GENPL1|GENPL2|GENPL3|PARTPL1|PARTPL2|ILLPL1|ILLPL2|ILLPL3 ;
def SEP   %|:0 ;
def NT    [? - TAGS - IDS - "|"];
def Alph  [a|b|c|d|e|é|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z|ä|ö|"'"];
def P     SEP Alph+ ; # Goes at beginning of each entry
def PS    SEP Alph* ; # If we already constrain the word

def Back [a|o|u];
def Front [ö|y|ä];
def VH  A -> a, O -> o || Back ~$Front _ .o. A -> ä, O -> ö ; # Vowel Harmony
def VL  V -> a || a _ .o. V -> e || e _ .o. V -> i || i _ .o. V -> o || o _ .o. V -> u || u _ .o. V -> y || y _ .o. V -> ä || ä _ .o. V -> ö || ö _ ; # Vowel lengthening rule

def Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|z|"'"];
def Vow  [a|e|é|i|o|u|y|ä|ö];
def DelVowel Vow X -> 0 ; # We sometimes insert an X to mark that the preceding vowel needs to be deleted

def WeakCG [{kk}:k|{pp}:p|{tt}:t|k:0|p:v|t:d|{nk}:{ng}|{mp}:{mm}|{lt}:{ll}|{nt}:{nn}|{rt}:{rr}|k:j|k:v]; # Weakening CG
def StrCG [k:{kk}|p:{pp}|t:{tt}|0:k|v:p|d:t|{ng}:{nk}|{mm}:{mp}|{ll}:{lt}|{nn}:{nt}|{rr}:{rt}|j:k]; # Strengthening CG

def kkO [k k o | k k ö]; 
def kkOCG [k k:0 [o|ö]];
def kkA [k k a | k k ä]; 
def kkACG [k k:0 a | k k:0 ä]; 
def LV [a a | e e | i i | o o | u u | y y | ä ä | ö ö];
def LDPTH [i e | u o | y ö]; 
def DelDouble [{aa}:a | {ee}:e | {ii}:i | {oo}:o | {uu}:u | {yy}:y | {ää}:ä | {öö}:ö];
def Dipth [a i|e i|o i|u i|y i|ä i|ö i|a u|e u|i u|o u|ä y|ö y|i y|e y|i e|u o|y ö];
def AllDouble  [LV | Dipth];
def Class3V [a o|e o|i o|i ö|i e|o e];
def CountSyll  [Cons* [LV|Dipth|Vow] Cons*] @-> ... "-" ;

def 3SyllMin (%|) [[Cons|Vow]+ .o. CountSyll .o. [?* %- ?* %- ?* %- ?*]].u;  # Min 3 syllables
def 2SyllMin (%|) [[Cons|Vow]+ .o. CountSyll .o. [?* %- ?* %- ?*]].u;  # Min 3 syllables
def 3S(Z) (3SyllMin .o. Z);
def 2S(Z) (2SyllMin .o. Z);
